src/main/resources/com/itextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/lv.xml
2b3da3mies.
2c3da3mies.
2?3da3mies.
2d3da3mies.
2f3da3mies.
2g3da3mies.
2?3da3mies.
2h3da3mies.
2j3da3mies.
2k3da3mies.
2?3da3mies.
2l3da3mies.
2?3da3mies.
2m3da3mies.
2n3da3mies.
2?3da3mies.
2p3da3mies.
2r3da3mies.
2s3da3mies.
2š3da3mies.
2t3da3mies.
2v3da3mies.
2z3da3mies.
2ž3da3mies.
2b3da3m?s.
2c3da3m?s.
2?3da3m?s.
2d3da3m?s.
2f3da3m?s.
2g3da3m?s.
2?3da3m?s.
2h3da3m?s.
2j3da3m?s.
2k3da3m?s.
2?3da3m?s.
2l3da3m?s.
2?3da3m?s.
2m3da3m?s.
2n3da3m?s.
2?3da3m?s.
2p3da3m?s.
2r3da3m?s.
2s3da3m?s.
2š3da3m?s.
2t3da3m?s.
2v3da3m?s.
2z3da3m?s.
2ž3da3m?s.
2b3gans.
2c3gans.
2?3gans.
2d3gans.
2f3gans.
2g3gans.
2?3gans.
2h3gans.
2j3gans.
2k3gans.
2?3gans.
2l3gans.
2?3gans.
2m3gans.
2n3gans.
2?3gans.
2p3gans.
2r3gans.
2s3gans.
2š3gans.
2t3gans.
2v3gans.
2z3gans.
2ž3gans.
2b3ga3na.
2c3ga3na.
2?3ga3na.
2d3ga3na.
2f3ga3na.
2g3ga3na.
2?3ga3na.
2h3ga3na.
2j3ga3na.
2k3ga3na.
2?3ga3na.
2l3ga3na.
2?3ga3na.
2m3ga3na.
2n3ga3na.
2?3ga3na.
2p3ga3na.
2r3ga3na.
2s3ga3na.
2š3ga3na.
2t3ga3na.
2v3ga3na.
2z3ga3na.
2ž3ga3na.
2b3nieks.
2c3nieks.
2?3nieks.
2d3nieks.
2f3nieks.
2g3nieks.
2?3nieks.
2h3nieks.
2j3nieks.
2k3nieks.
2?3nieks.
2l3nieks.
2?3nieks.
2m3nieks.
2n3nieks.
2?3nieks.
2p3nieks.
2r3nieks.
2s3nieks.
2š3nieks.
2t3nieks.
2v3nieks.
2z3nieks.
2ž3nieks.
2b3nie3ce.
2c3nie3ce.
2?3nie3ce.
2d3nie3ce.
2f3nie3ce.
2g3nie3ce.
2?3nie3ce.
2h3nie3ce.
2j3nie3ce.
2k3nie3ce.
2?3nie3ce.
2l3nie3ce.
2?3nie3ce.
2m3nie3ce.
2n3nie3ce.
2?3nie3ce.
2p3nie3ce.
2r3nie3ce.
2s3nie3ce.
2š3nie3ce.
2t3nie3ce.
2v3nie3ce.
2z3nie3ce.
2ž3nie3ce.
2b3n?3ca.
2c3n?3ca.
2?3n?3ca.
2d3n?3ca.
2f3n?3ca.
2g3n?3ca.
2?3n?3ca.
2h3n?3ca.
2j3n?3ca.
2k3n?3ca.
2?3n?3ca.
2l3n?3ca.
2?3n?3ca.
2m3n?3ca.
2n3n?3ca.
2?3n?3ca.
2p3n?3ca.
2r3n?3ca.
2s3n?3ca.
2š3n?3ca.
2t3n?3ca.
2v3n?3ca.
2z3n?3ca.
2ž3n?3ca.
2b3ša3na.
2c3ša3na.
2?3ša3na.
2d3ša3na.
2f3ša3na.
2g3ša3na.
2?3ša3na.
2h3ša3na.
2j3ša3na.
2k3ša3na.
2?3ša3na.
2l3ša3na.
2?3ša3na.
2m3ša3na.
2n3ša3na.
2?3ša3na.
2p3ša3na.
2r3ša3na.
2s3ša3na.
2š3ša3na.
2t3ša3na.
2v3ša3na.
2z3ša3na.
2ž3ša3na.
2b3ša3n?s.
2c3ša3n?s.
2?3ša3n?s.
2d3ša3n?s.
2f3ša3n?s.
2g3ša3n?s.
2?3ša3n?s.
2h3ša3n?s.
2j3ša3n?s.
2k3ša3n?s.
2?3ša3n?s.
2l3ša3n?s.
2?3ša3n?s.
2m3ša3n?s.
2n3ša3n?s.
2?3ša3n?s.
2p3ša3n?s.
2r3ša3n?s.
2s3ša3n?s.
2š3ša3n?s.
2t3ša3n?s.
2v3ša3n?s.
2z3ša3n?s.
2ž3ša3n?s.
2b3ta3la.
2c3ta3la.
2?3ta3la.
2d3ta3la.
2f3ta3la.
2g3ta3la.
2?3ta3la.
2h3ta3la.
2j3ta3la.
2k3ta3la.
2?3ta3la.
2l3ta3la.
2?3ta3la.
2m3ta3la.
2n3ta3la.
2?3ta3la.
2p3ta3la.
2r3ta3la.
2s3ta3la.
2š3ta3la.
2t3ta3la.
2v3ta3la.
2z3ta3la.
2ž3ta3la.
2b3tu3ve.
2c3tu3ve.
2?3tu3ve.
2d3tu3ve.
2f3tu3ve.
2g3tu3ve.
2?3tu3ve.
2h3tu3ve.
2j3tu3ve.
2k3tu3ve.
2?3tu3ve.
2l3tu3ve.
2?3tu3ve.
2m3tu3ve.
2n3tu3ve.
2?3tu3ve.
2p3tu3ve.
2r3tu3ve.
2s3tu3ve.
2š3tu3ve.
2t3tu3ve.
2v3tu3ve.
2z3tu3ve.
2ž3tu3ve.
.j?3a2
.ne3a2
.ie3a2
.no3a2
.pa3a2
.pie3a2
.sa3a2
.uz3a2
.aiz3a2
.ap3a2
.at3a2
.bez3a2
.p?r3a2
.iz3a2
.eks3a2
.vis3a2
.j?3?2
.ne3?2
.ie3?2
.no3?2
.pa3?2
.pie3?2
.sa3?2
.uz3?2
.aiz3?2
.ap3?2
.at3?2
.bez3?2
.p?r3?2
.iz3?2
.eks3?2
.vis3?2
.j?3e2
.ne3e2
.ie3e2
.no3e2
.pa3e2
.pie3e2
.sa3e2
.uz3e2
.aiz3e2
.ap3e2
.at3e2
.bez3e2
.p?r3e2
.iz3e2
.eks3e2
.vis3e2
.j?3?2
.ne3?2
.ie3?2
.no3?2
.pa3?2
.pie3?2
.sa3?2
.uz3?2
.aiz3?2
.ap3?2
.at3?2
.bez3?2
.p?r3?2
.iz3?2
.eks3?2
.vis3?2
.j?3i2
.ne3i2
.ie3i2
.no3i2
.pa3i2
.pie3i2
.sa3i2
.uz3i2
.aiz3i2
.ap3i2
.at3i2
.bez3i2
.p?r3i2
.iz3i2
.eks3i2
.vis3i2
.j?3?2
.ne3?2
.ie3?2
.no3?2
.pa3?2
.pie3?2
.sa3?2
.uz3?2
.aiz3?2
.ap3?2
.at3?2
.bez3?2
.p?r3?2
.iz3?2
.eks3?2
.vis3?2
.j?3o2
.ne3o2
.ie3o2
.no3o2
.pa3o2
.pie3o2
.sa3o2
.uz3o2
.aiz3o2
.ap3o2
.at3o2
.bez3o2
.p?r3o2
.iz3o2
.eks3o2
.vis3o2
.j?3u2
.ne3u2
.ie3u2
.no3u2
.pa3u2
.pie3u2
.sa3u2
.uz3u2
.aiz3u2
.ap3u2
.at3u2
.bez3u2
.p?r3u2
.iz3u2
.eks3u2
.vis3u2
.j?3?2
.ne3?2
.ie3?2
.no3?2
.pa3?2
.pie3?2
.sa3?2
.uz3?2
.aiz3?2
.ap3?2
.at3?2
.bez3?2
.p?r3?2
.iz3?2
.eks3?2
.vis3?2
.j?3ie1
.j?3iz1
.j?3no1
.ne3aiz1
.ne3ap1
.ne3ie1
.ne3at1
.ne3in1
.ne3iz1
.ne3sa
.ne3uz1
.priek2š1
4d5ze1me
.tur2p1m
il2k1tie
.spil2g1t
m?1ne2š1
1pa1d2smit
g2š1gal
k2š1gal
tran2s
1port
v?s2t1n
v?s2t1k
pa2t3st?
pa2s2t3k
pa2s2t3m
pa2s2t2s.
pa2r2k2s.
pa2r3ket
sa2ls.
sa2lds.
sa2l2d1
pir2m1r
pir2m1k
pir2m2s1
ot2r1r2
ot2r1k2
ir2k3l
ir2k3?
.ad?2m3
.ai4z5
ak3me4?3
apak2š3
ap1au
k?r2t3n
aug2s2t3
.at3e2j
bal2t3ma
.vie2n1
</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
